Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Employment, Duties, Uniforms Compensation and Transportation of Patrol Officers

§ 45-7-1.
Counties may employ men to enforce road laws.

The board of supervisors of any county is hereby authorized to employ, in its discretion, not exceeding three (3) men in counties of Classes 1 and 2, and not exceeding two (2) men to be regularly employed at any time in counties of other classes, whose duty it shall be to patrol the roads of the county and to enforce the road and motor vehicle laws.

It is hereby expressly provided that such patrol officers shall not have the power and authority, nor shall they be authorized by the motor vehicle comptroller or the tax collector of any county, to enforce any of the provisions of law relating to the taxation of motor vehicles using the highways of this state; nor shall they receive or collect any taxes due or alleged to be due under any of such laws. This shall not apply to a county where the federal government owns thirty-five percent (35%) or more of the total acreage of the county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5583; 1942, § 8061; Laws, 1926, ch. 202; Laws, 1946, ch. 277, § 1.

§ 45-7-3.
Duties of patrol officers; uniforms.

Said patrol officers are hereby authorized to do and perform all acts authorized to be done by the sheriff, constable, or any peace officer. Said patrol officers in addition to their duties as peace officers, shall note the condition of the roads and bridges of the county and make report thereof to the board of supervisors as may be required by said board.

Such patrol officer shall not have the power and authority to enforce the traffic laws, rules and regulations of this state, or any related laws upon any highway of the state highway system, unless and until they have been authorized and empowered to enforce such laws and to aid and assist in the enforcement thereof by the commissioner of public safety. The commissioner of public safety may grant or withhold such authority to the patrolmen of each individual county in his discretion, and may provide and promulgate reasonable rules and regulations under which the patrol officers to whom such authority has been granted shall act in enforcing such laws.

In the performance of their official duties such patrol officers shall have the power and authority to wear uniforms, but they shall not wear the same uniforms as are worn by members of the highway safety patrol of Mississippi, nor shall they wear uniforms substantially identical thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5584; 1942, § 8062; Laws, 1926, ch. 202; Laws, 1946, ch. 277, § 2.

§ 45-7-5.
Compensation; transportation.

Subject to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, the board of supervisors may compensate the county patrol officers in an amount not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) per month for any one (1) county; in no case shall any one (1) patrol officer receive compensation in excess of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) per month. In addition to such compensation, the board of supervisors may furnish the patrol officers means of transportation.

The board of supervisors of any county having a population of thirty-one thousand six hundred fifty-three (31,653) according to the 1960 federal decennial census, having a land area of nine hundred thirty-eight (938) square miles, and wherein U.S. Highway 49 and Mississippi Highway 16 intersect, may compensate the county patrol officers in an amount not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per month for any such county; in no case shall any one (1) patrol officer receive compensation in excess of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) per month.

The board of supervisors of any county bordering on the Louisiana line and Mississippi River may fix the compensation of the county patrol officers at an amount not to exceed Four Hundred Dollars ($400.00) per month per patrol officer.

The board of supervisors of any county bordering on the Mississippi River wherein is located a national park and cemetery, wherein U.S. Highways 80 and 61 intersect, and having a population in excess of forty-two thousand (42,000) according to the 1960 federal decennial census, may compensate the county patrol officers in an amount not to exceed One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) per month for any such county but in no case in excess of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) per month per officer.

The board of supervisors of any Class 4 county bordering on the state of Alabama wherein U.S. Highway 98 and Mississippi Highway 63 intersect, having a land area of four hundred eighty-one (481) square miles, may, in its discretion, compensate each of its county patrol officers in an amount not in excess of Six Hundred Fifty Dollars ($650.00) per month.

The board of supervisors of any county in which U.S. Highway 45 and Mississippi Highway 16 intersect may, in its discretion, compensate its county patrol officers in an amount not to exceed Six Hundred Dollars ($600.00) per month per patrol officer.

The board of supervisors of any county in which the Natchez Trace Parkway and Mississippi Highway 35 intersect and which has a population according to the 1990 federal decennial census in excess of eighteen thousand four hundred (18,400), in its discretion, may compensate its county patrol officers in an amount not to exceed Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) per month per patrol officer.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5585; 1942, § 8063; Laws, 1926, ch. 202; Laws, 1968, ch. 291, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 366, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 538, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 325; Laws, 2001, ch. 441, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001.